Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-508
Liability insurance; automobiles; bankruptcy of insured; policy provisions; reciprocity.

The policies or contracts of insurance covering legal liability for injury to a person or persons caused by the ownership, operation, use, or maintenance of an automobile issued by any domestic or foreign company shall, if filed with the director pursuant to the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act, contain a provision that the insolvency or bankruptcy of the assured shall not release the company from the payment of damages for injury sustained or loss occasioned during the life of the policy, and, in case of such insolvency or bankruptcy, an action may be maintained within the terms and limits of the policy by the injured person or his or her heirs against the insurer.

Laws 1925, c. 124, § 4, p. 330;

C.S.1929, § 44-607;

R.S.1943, § 44-508;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 6.

Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act, see section 44-7501.